Massachusetts, session 194th, S1188.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4D of chapter 260, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out subsection (b) in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the
following subsection:-
(b) A civil action for trafficking of persons for forced labor or services or sexual
servitude shall be commenced within 10 years of the date on which the human trafficking victim
was freed from human trafficking or, if the victim was a child during the commission of the
offense, within 10 years after the date the plaintiff attains the age of 18.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 260 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 36 the
following 3 sections:-
of 3

Section 37. (a) Except as otherwise provided, the following actions shall be commenced
within 10 years next after the cause of action accrues:
(i) an action of tort for assault or battery where the conduct constituting the tort shall
constitute: (A) an act of torture as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2340(1); (B) an act of genocide as
provided in 18 U.S.C. § 1091; (C) a war crime as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2441(c); or (D) an
attempted extrajudicial killing as defined in § 3(a) of the federal Torture Victim Protection Act
of 1991, Pub. L. 102–256; (E) crimes against humanity as defined in section 38 of said chapter
260;
(ii) an action for wrongful death where the death arises out of conduct listed in clause (i)
or an “extrajudicial killing” as defined in said § 3(a) of said Torture Victim Protection Act of
1991, Pub. L. 102–256;
(iii) an action for trafficking of persons for forced labor or services or sexual servitude
brought under section 4D;
(iv) an action for the taking of property in violation of international law where the
property or any property exchanged for the property is: (A) present in the United States in
connection with a commercial activity conducted in the United States by the foreign state; or (B)
(B) owned or operated by an agency or instrumentality of a foreign state and the agency or
instrumentality is engaged in a commercial activity in the United States; or
(v) an action seeking benefits under an insurance policy where the insurance claim arises
out of conduct listed in subsections (a) to (d), inclusive.
of 3

(b) Pursuant to section 19, an action brought under this section that fails to comply with a
previously applicable statute of limitations shall not be dismissed.
(c) All other statutory and equitable grounds for tolling shall apply to an action brought
under this section and nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the applicability of other
grounds of statutory or equitable tolling that may extend limitations periods for more than 10
years.
Section 38. “Crimes against humanity” shall mean any of the following acts as part of a
widespread or systematic attack directed against a civilian population, with knowledge of the
attack: murder; extermination; enslavement; forcible transfer of population; arbitrary detention;
rape; sexual slavery; enforced prostitution; forced pregnancy; forced sterilization; persecution on
political, racial, national, ethnic, cultural, religious, or gender grounds; enforced disappearance
of persons; or other grave inhumane acts intentionally causing great suffering or serious physical
or psychological injury.
Section 39. For an action where the applicable statute of limitations is provided in section
37, a prevailing plaintiff may be awarded reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs including, but not
limited to, expert witness fees and expenses.
SECTION 3. This act shall apply retroactively.
of 3